Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201090-501
Transfer to Personnel Division Revolving
Fund.

The
State Treasurer shall transfer $100,000 from the Department of Administrative
Services Revolving Fund to the Personnel Division Revolving Fund, as soon
as possible, on or after May 20, 2009.

Laws 2009, LB316, § 1.